Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.157

Delegation of rights and powers to manage.

A member or manager of a limited liability company has the power and authority to delegate to one or more other persons the member's or manager's rights and powers to manage and control the business and affairs of the limited liability company, including to delegate to agents, officers, and employees of a member or manager or the limited liability company, and to delegate by a management agreement or another agreement with, or otherwise to, other persons. Such delegation by a member or manager of a limited liability company does not cause the member or manager to cease to be a member or manager of the limited liability company or cause the person to whom any such rights and powers have been delegated to be a member or manager of the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 33.]